Rhode Island, session 2025, SB311.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-14.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-14.1 entitled "Minority
Business Enterprise" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-14.1-6. Minority business enterprise participation.
(a) Minority business enterprises shall be included in all procurements and construction
projects under this chapter and shall be awarded a minimum of fifteen percent (15%) of the dollar
value of the entire procurement or project. Of that fifteen percent (15%), minority business
enterprises owned and controlled by a minority owner, as defined in § 37-14.1-3, shall be awarded
a minimum of seven and one-half percent (7.5%), and minority business enterprises owned and
controlled by a woman shall be awarded a minimum of seven and one-half percent (7.5%).
Annually, by October 1, the department of administration shall submit a report to the general
assembly on the status of achieving the aforementioned participation requirements in the most
recent fiscal year. The director of the department of administration is further authorized to establish
by rules and regulation the certification process and formulas for giving minority business
enterprises a preference in contract and subcontract awards.
(b) Any minority business enterprise currently certified by the U.S. Small Business
Administration as an 8(a) firm governed by 13 C.F.R. part 124 shall be deemed to be certified by
the department of administration as a minority business enterprise and shall only be required to
submit evidence of federal certification of good standing.

(c) The provisions of this chapter shall not be waived, including, but not limited to, during
a declared state of emergency.
(d) The state of Rhode Island will arrange for a disparity study to evaluate the need for the
development of programs to enhance the participation in state contracts of business enterprises
owned by women and minorities, to be repeated every five (5) years, beginning in fiscal year 2025.
(e)(1) The department of administration shall provide a list of certified minority and
women-owned business enterprises to each prospective contractor and no waiver for this chapter
shall be granted until after each prospective contractor receives assistance from the department of
administration with compliance of this chapter.
(2) Upon issuance of a waiver of compliance, the department of administration shall make
publicly available records of all waivers of compliance. Such records shall include:
(3) Information identifying the contract, including the value of the contract;
(4) Information identifying the contracting agency;
(5) The name of the contractor receiving the waiver;
(6) The date of the waiver; and
(7) The specific contract provisions to which the waiver applies.
(f) Each contracting agency that substantially fails to make a good faith effort to achieve
the maximum feasible participation of minority and women-owned business enterprises in such
agency’s contracting shall be required to submit to the director of the department of administration
a remedial action plan to remedy such failure.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000549
========
LC000549 - Page 2 of 3